Utah statutes.
38-2-7.   Compensation -- Attorney's lien.
(1)  The compensation of an attorney is governed by agreement between the
attorney and a client, express or implied, which is not restrained by law.
(2)  An attorney shall have a lien for the balance of compensation due from a
client on any moneys or property owned by the client that is the subject of or
connected with work performed for the client, including, but not limited to:
(a)  any real or personal property that is the subject of or connected with
the work performed for the client;
(b)  any funds held by the attorney for the client, including any amounts paid
as a retainer to the attorney by the client; and
(c)  any settlement, verdict, report, decision, or judgment in the client's
favor in any matter or action in which the attorney assisted, including any
proceeds derived from the matter or action, whether or not the attorney is
employed by the client at the time the settlement, verdict, report, decision,
or judgment is obtained.
(3)  An attorney's lien commences at the time of employment of the attorney by
the client.
(4)  An attorney may enforce a lien under this section by moving to intervene
in a pending legal action in which the attorney has assisted or performed
work, or by filing a separate legal action.  An attorney may not move to
intervene in an action or file a separate legal action to enforce a lien
before 30 days has expired after a demand for payment has been made and not
been complied with.
(5)  An attorney may file a notice of lien in a pending legal action in which
the attorney has assisted or performed work for which the attorney has a lien
under this section.  In addition, an attorney may file a notice of lien with
the county recorder of the county in which real property that is subject to a
lien under this section is located.  A notice of lien shall include the
following:
(a)  the name, address, and telephone number of the attorney claiming the
lien;
(b)  the name of the client who is the owner of the property subject to the
lien;
(c)  a verification that the property is the subject of or connected with work
performed by the attorney for the client and that a demand for payment of
amounts owed to the attorney for the work has been made and not been paid
within 30 days of the demand;
(d)  the date the attorney first provided services to the client;
(e)  a description of the property, sufficient for identification; and
(f)  the signature of the lien claimant and an acknowledgment or certificate
as required under Title 57, Chapter 3, Recording of Documents.
(6)  Within 30 days after filing the notice of lien, the attorney shall
deliver or mail by certified mail to the client a copy of the notice of lien.
(7)  Any person who takes an interest in any property, other than real
property, that is subject to an attorney's lien with actual or constructive
knowledge of the attorney's lien, takes his or her interest subject to the
attorney's lien.  An attorney's lien on real property has as its priority the
date and time when a notice of lien is filed with the county recorder of the
county in which real property that is subject to a lien under this section is
located.
(8)  This section does not alter or diminish in any way an attorney's common
law retaining lien rights.
(9)  This section does not authorize an attorney to have a lien in the
representation of a client in a criminal matter or domestic relations matter
where a final order of divorce has not been secured unless:
(a)  the criminal matter has been concluded or the domestic relations matter
has been concluded by the securing of a final order of divorce or the
attorney/client relationship has terminated; and
(b)  the client has failed to fulfill the client's financial obligation to the
attorney.
